Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,211
Collection system; departments implement.

The Department of Revenue, the Department of Administrative Services, and the Department of Motor Vehicles shall develop and implement a collection system to carry out the intent of section 77-27,210.

Laws 1997, LB 720, § 26.